dictsource/sq_rules
// translation rules for Albanian
// This file is UTF-8 encoded

.L02 b d g gj xh
.L03 dh gj ll nj rr sh th xh zh   // 2-letter consonants

.replace
//	Cyrl	Latn	-- Cyrillic to Latin
	а	a	// U+0430
	б	b	// U+0431
	в	v	// U+0432
	г	g	// U+0433
	д	d	// U+0434
	е	e	// U+0435
	ж	ž	// U+0436
	з	z	// U+0437
	и	i	// U+0438
	к	k	// U+043A
	л	l	// U+043B
	м	m	// U+043C
	н	n	// U+043D
	о	o	// U+043E
	п	p	// U+043F
	р	r	// U+0440
	с	s	// U+0441
	т	t	// U+0442
	у	u	// U+0443
	ф	f	// U+0444
	х	h	// U+0445
	ц	c	// U+0446
	ч	č	// U+0447
	ш	š	// U+0161
	ђ	đ	// U+0452
	ѓ	đ	// U+0453
	ѕ	dz	// U+0455
	ј	j	// U+0458
	љ	lj	// U+0459
	њ	nj	// U+045A
	ћ	ć	// U+045B
	ќ	ć	// U+045C
	џ	dž	// U+045F

.group a
        a        a
        aj       aI
        a (_     A   // if stressed
        a (rK    A

     @) at (_    =at
     @) ave (_   =avE
     @) arëve (_ =aR@vE
     @) ani (q_  =ani

.group b
        b        b

.group c
        c        ts

.group ç
        ç        tS

.group d
        d        d
        dh       D

.group e
        e        E
     j) e        e
    n^) e        e
     q) e        e
     l) e        e
    ll) e        E
    sh) e        e
        e (j     e
        ej (K    eI
        e (sh    e
        e (sj    e

     @) en (_    =En
     @) es (_    =Es
     @) et (_    =Et
     @) eve (_   =EvE
     @) evi (q_  =Evi

.group ë
        ë        V
    n^) ë        I#
    AC) ë (_     @/    // silent
   Aht) ë (_     @/    // silent
   Ast) ë (_     @/    // silent
   AjC) ë (_     @/    // silent
   ArC) ë (_     @/    // silent
  AL03) ë (_     @/    // silent
     @) ë (X     %V

     @) ëse (_   =@sE
     @) ësi (_   =@si
     @) ëta (_   =@ta
     @) ëve (_   =@vE
     @) ëvi (_   =@vi
     @) ësisht (_ =sISt

.group f
        f        f

.group g
        g        g
        gj       dZ;

.group h
        h        h
        h (K     hh

.group i
        i        i
        ie       je
        ij (K    i:

   @ic) i (_     'i
   @ër) i (_     'i
     @) im (_    =im
     @) in (_    =In
     @) i (q_    =i
     @) i (t_    =I
        i (un_   'i

.group j
        j        j

.group k
        k        k

.group l
        l        L
        ll       ll

.group m
        m        m

.group n
        n        n
        nj       n^

.group o
        o        O
        oj (K    OI
        oi (l_   OI
        ovi(q_  =Ovi

.group p
        p        p

.group q
        q        c

.group r
        r        R
        r (K     R
        rr       RR2
     _) rr       @R2

     _) rre (gulla @R2'e


.group s
        s        s
        sh       S

//   L02) sh       @-S     // epenthetic

.group t
        t        t
        th       T

.group u
        u        u
        ua       wA   // diphthong ??
        u (ajK   w
     t) u (an_   'u
        u (ar_   'u
//        ue       we

        u (ara_  'u
        u (esve_ 'u
     @) u (n_    =u
     @) u (r_    =u

.group v
        v        v

.group w
        w        w

.group x
        x        dz
        xh       dZ
        x (_     ks

.group y
        y        y
        ye       yE    // diphthong

.group z
        z        z
        zh       Z


.group
	$	dOllari
